Utah statutes.
17C-2-104.   Existing and historic buildings and uses in an urban renewal project area.

If any of the existing buildings or uses in an urban renewal project area are included in or eligible for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or the State Register, the agency shall comply with Section 9-8-404 as though the agency were a state agency.

